packages/hunspell-reader/dictionaries/eu/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 188 0 ziezazkiokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkioketen .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkioketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkiokete/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkizuekeen .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkizuekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkizuekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkizueketen .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkizueketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkizuekete/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkizukeen .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkizukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkizukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkizuketen .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkizuketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazkizukete/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazuekeen .
SFX 188 0 ziezazuekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazuekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazueketen .
SFX 188 0 ziezazueketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazuekete/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazukeen .
SFX 188 0 ziezazukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazuketen .
SFX 188 0 ziezazuketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ziezazukete/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zigun .
SFX 188 0 zigun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zigun .
SFX 188 0 zigun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ziguten .
SFX 188 0 ziguten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ziguten .
SFX 188 0 ziguten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zigute/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zigute/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zigu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zigu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziharduen .
SFX 188 0 ziharduen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihardue/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihardukan .
SFX 188 0 zihardukan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihardukaten .
SFX 188 0 zihardukaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihardukate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziharduka/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihardukeen .
SFX 188 0 zihardukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihardukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziharduketen .
SFX 188 0 ziharduketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihardukete/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihardukikeen .
SFX 188 0 zihardukikeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihardukikee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihardukiketen .
SFX 188 0 zihardukiketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihardukikete/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ziharduten .
SFX 188 0 ziharduten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihardute/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakiakeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoakiakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakiakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakian .
SFX 188 0 zihoakian/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakidakeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoakidakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakidakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakidan .
SFX 188 0 zihoakidan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakida/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakiekeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoakiekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakiekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakien .
SFX 188 0 zihoakien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakigukeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoakigukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakigukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakigun .
SFX 188 0 zihoakigun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakigu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakinakeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoakinakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakinakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakinan .
SFX 188 0 zihoakinan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakiokeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoakiokeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakiokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakion .
SFX 188 0 zihoakion/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakio/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakizuekeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoakizuekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakizuekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakizuen .
SFX 188 0 zihoakizuen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakizue/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakizukeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoakizukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakizukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakizun .
SFX 188 0 zihoakizun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoakizu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoan .
SFX 188 0 zihoan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazen .
SFX 188 0 zihoazen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoaze/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkiakeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkiakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkiakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkian .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkian/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkidakeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkidakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkidakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkidan .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkidan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkida/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkiekeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkiekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkiekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkien .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkigukeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkigukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkigukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkigun .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkigun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkigu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkinakeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkinakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkinakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkinan .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkinan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkiokeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkiokeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkiokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkion .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkion/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkio/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkizuekeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkizuekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkizuekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkizuen .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkizuen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkizue/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkizukeen .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkizukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkizukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkizun .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkizun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zihoazkizu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zihoa/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zinan .
SFX 188 0 zinan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zinan .
SFX 188 0 zinan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zinaten .
SFX 188 0 zinaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zinaten .
SFX 188 0 zinaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zinate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zinate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zina .
SFX 188 0 zina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zina .
SFX 188 0 zina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzadan .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzadan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzada/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzad/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzagun .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzagun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzagu .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzagu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzakedan .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzakedan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzakeda/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzaked/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzakeen .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzakegun .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzakegun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzakegu .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzakegu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzaketen .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzaketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzakete .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzaket .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzaket/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzake .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzan .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzaten .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzate .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekartzat .
SFX 188 0 zindekartza .
SFX 188 0 zindekartza/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketedan .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketedan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketeda/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketed/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketegun .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketegun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketegu .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketegu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketen .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketeten .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketeten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketete .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketet .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzketet/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzkete .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzkete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarztedan .
SFX 188 0 zindekarztedan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzteda/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzted/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarztegun .
SFX 188 0 zindekarztegun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarztegu .
SFX 188 0 zindekarztegu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzten .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzteten .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzteten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarztete .
SFX 188 0 zindekarztete/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekarztet .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzte .
SFX 188 0 zindekarzte/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazkedan .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazkedan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazkeda/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazked/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazkeen .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazkeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazkee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazkegun .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazkegun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazkegu .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazkegu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazketedan .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazketedan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazketeda/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazketed/1,400 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazketegun .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazketegun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazketegu .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazketegu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazketen .
SFX 188 0 zindekusazketen/1,403 .
